Tennessee, session 114, SB0738.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-8-305(d)(6), is amended by adding
the following to the end of the subdivision:
Thereafter, the state capitol commission is responsible for the upkeep and maintenance
of the monument through funds appropriated to the commission.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0738
002350
- 1 -